Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.070

Exceptions.

This chapter does not apply to an automated teller machine or night deposit facility that is:

(1) Located inside of a building, unless it is a freestanding installation that exists for the sole purpose of providing an enclosure for the automated teller machine or night deposit facility;

(2) Located inside a building, except to the extent a transaction can be conducted from outside the building; or

(3) Located in an area, including an access area, building, enclosed space, or parking area that is not controlled by the operator.

[ 1993 c 324 s 7.]